District of Columbia statutes.
29A-301.27

Repealed

Shares of stock and dividends prohibited.

Repealed.

Aug. 6, 1962, 76 Stat. 275, Pub. L. 87-569, § 27
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(l), 58 DCR 1720
1973 Ed., § 29-1027.
1981 Ed., § 29-527.
2001 Ed., § 29-301.27.